District of Columbia statutes.
21-2045

Acceptance of appointment; consent of jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered or mailed to the guardian at the address listed in the court records and at the address as then known to the petitioner, except where the guardian resides in a foreign jurisdiction in which case notice shall be made to the court.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-207 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).
1981 Ed., § 21-2045.